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DTC P 1300/14 Igniter Circuit Malfunction No. 1

DTC P 1310/15 Igniter Circuit Malfunction No.2

DTC P 1320/14 Igniter Circuit Malfunction No.3

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
A DIS (Direct Ignition System) has been adopted. The DIS improves the ignition timing accuracy, reduces
high−voltage loss,andenhances theoverall reliabilityof the ignitionsystembyeliminating thedistributor.
TheDIS isa2 −cylindersimultaneous ignitionsystemwhich ignites2cylinderssimultaneouslywith1 ignition
coil. In the2 −cylindersimultaneous ignitionsystem,eachof the2sparkplugs isconnected to theendof the
secondary winding. High voltage generated in the secondary winding is applied directly to the 2 spark plugs.
The sparks of the 2 spark plugs pass simultaneously from the center electrode to the ground electrode.
The engine ECU determines ignition timing and outputs the ignition signals (IGT) for each cylinder. Based
on IGT signals, the power transistors in the igniter cuts off the current to the primary coil in the ignition coil
issuppliedsimultaneously to the2sparkplugsvia thehigh −tensioncords thatareconnected to theboth
ends of the secondary coil. At the same time, the igniter also sends an ignition confirmation signal (IGF) as
a fail −safemeasure to theengineECU.
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DTC No DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P1300/14
No IGFsi gnal toen gineECUfor6consecutive IGT1si gnals

SOpenorshort in IGFor IGT1circuit from ignitioncoil to
engineECU.

P1300/14
No IGF signal to engineECU for 6 consecutive IGT1 signals
during engine running

engine ECU.
S IgnitioncoilNo.1 (w/ Igniter)
SEngineECU

P1310/15
No IGFsignal toengineECUfor6consecutive IGT2signals
during engine running

SOpenorshort in IGFor IGT2circuit from ignitioncoil to
engineECU.

S IgnitioncoilNo.2 (w/ Igniter)
SEngineECU

P1320/14
No IGFsignal toengineECUfor6consecutive IGT3signals
during engine running

SOpenorshort in IGFor IGT3circuit from ignitioncoil to
engineECU.

S IgnitioncoilNo.3 (w/ Igniter)
SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S Read freed frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions

when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time
of the malfunction.

S DTC P1300/14 is for the ignition circuit of No.1 and No.6 cylinders.
S DTC P1310/15 is for the ignition circuit of No.2 and No.5 cylinders.
S DTC P1320/14 is for the ignition circuit of No.3 and No.4 cylinders.

1 Check spark plug and spark (See page IG−1).

NG Go to step 4.

OK

2Checkforopenandshort inharnessandconnector in IGF 1 signalcircuit
between engine ECU and ignition coil No.1, No.2 No.3 (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3Disconnect ignitioncoilNo. 1,No.2,No.3connectorsandcheckvoltagebetween
terminal IGF 1 ofengineECUconnectorandbodyground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 connectors.
(b) Remove the glove compartment door.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal IGF1 of engine ECU con-
nector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage:4.5 − 5.5V

OK Replace ignition coil No. 1,No.2,No.3.

NG
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Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

4 Check for open and short in harness and connector in IGT1, 2, 3 signal circuit
between engine ECU and ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

5 Check voltage between terminals IGT1, 2, 3 of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove the grove compartment door.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IGT1, 2, 3 of engine ECU
connector and body ground when engine is cranked.
OK:

Voltage: More than 0.1 V and less than 4.5 V

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
During idling, check waveform between terminals IGT1, 2, 3
and E1 of engine ECU.
HINT:
The correct waveform are as shown.
IGT2, IGT3 signal waveform is same as the IGT1 signal wave-
form.

NGCheckandreplaceengineECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

OK
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6 Disconnect ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 connector and check voltage between
terminals IGT1, 2, 3 of engine ECU connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 connectors.
(b) Remove the glove compartment door.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IGT1, 2, 3 of engine ECU
connector and body ground when engine is cranked.
OK:

Voltage: More than 0.1 V and less than 4.5 V

NG Replace ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3.

OK

7 Check ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 power source circuit.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 connectors.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal 1 of ignition coil (w/ ignitor)
connector and body ground, when ignition switch is turned to
”ON” and ”START” position.
OK:

Voltage: 9 − 14 V

NG Repair ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 power
source circuit.

OK

8 Check for open and short in harness and connector between ignition switch and
ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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9 Check EFI main relay (Marking: EFI) (See page FI−44).

NG Replace EFI main relay (Marking: EFI).

OK

Replace ignition coil No.1, No.2, ,No.3.


